Utah statutes.
78A-8-104.   Object of small claims -- Attachment, garnishment, and execution.

(1)  The hearing in a small claims action has the sole object of dispensing speedy justice between the parties.  The record of small claims proceedings shall be as provided by rule of the Judicial Council.

(2)  Attachment, garnishment, and execution may issue after judgment as prescribed by law, upon the payment of the fees required for those services.

